Hawaii statutes.
[§27-44] Electronic data set
availability; updates. (a) Each executive branch department shall use
reasonable efforts to make appropriate and existing electronic data sets
maintained by the department electronically available to the public through the
State's open data portal at data.hawaii.gov or successor website designated by
the chief information officer; provided that:

(1) Nothing in this chapter shall require departments
to create new electronic data sets or to make data sets available upon demand;

(2) Data licensed to the State by another person or
entity shall not be made public under this chapter unless the person or entity
licensing the data agrees to the public disclosure; and

(3) Proprietary and other information protected from
disclosure by law or contract shall not be disclosed.

Such disclosure shall be consistent with the
policies, procedures, and standards developed by the chief information officer
and consistent with applicable law, including chapter 92F and other state and
federal laws related to security and privacy, and no personally identifiable
information shall be posted online unless the identified individual has
consented to the posting or the posting is necessary to fulfill the lawful
purposes or duties of the department.

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall require the
chief information officer to adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 and nothing in
this chapter shall supersede chapter 27G.

(c) Each department shall update its
electronic data sets in the manner prescribed by the chief information officer
and as often as is necessary to preserve the integrity and usefulness of the
data sets to the extent that the department regularly maintains or updates the
data sets. [L 2013, c 263, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next